California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(b) Section 443(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to adjustment in deduction for personal exemption, is modified by substituting the phrase “the credit allowed under Section 17054” for the phrase “the exemptions allowed as a deduction under section 151
 (and any deduction in lieu thereof).”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 39.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17552.3.

(a) (1) The options under Sections 112(d)(2) and 112(d)(3) of the Federal Agriculture Improvement and Reform Act of 1996 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 7212(d)(2) and (3)), as in effect on October 21, 1998, shall be disregarded in determining the taxable year for which any payment under a production flexibility contract under Subtitle B of Title I of that act (as so in effect) is properly includable in gross income for purposes
 of this part, Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(2) In order to provide farmers with the same tax treatment for all payments in years beginning before January 1, 2002, with respect to production flexibility contract payments as provided under federal law as modified by Public Law 105-277, this subdivision shall apply to taxable years ending after December 31, 1995.

(b) Any option to accelerate the receipt of any payment under a production flexibility contract entered into on or after January 1, 2002, that is payable under the Federal Agriculture Improvement and Reform Act of 1996 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 7200 et seq.) as in effect on December 17, 1999, shall be disregarded in determining the taxable year for which that payment is properly includable in gross income for purposes of this part, Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and
 Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 34, Sec. 22.   Effective May 8, 2002.   See identical section added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

17552.3.

(a) (1) The options under Sections 112(d)(2) and 112(d)(3) of the Federal Agriculture
 Improvement and Reform Act of 1996 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 7212(d)(2) and (3)), as in effect on October 21, 1998, shall be disregarded in determining the taxable year for which any payment under a production flexibility contract under Subtitle B of Title I of that act (as so in effect) is properly includable in gross income for purposes of this part, Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(2) In order to provide farmers with the same tax treatment for all payments in years beginning before January 1, 2002, with respect to production flexibility contract payments as provided under federal law as modified by Public Law 105-277, this subdivision shall apply to taxable years ending after December 31, 1995.

(b) Any option to accelerate the receipt of any payment under a production flexibility contract entered into on or after January 1, 2002,
 that is payable under the Federal Agriculture Improvement and Reform Act of 1996 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 7200 et seq.) as in effect on December 17, 1999, shall be disregarded in determining the taxable year for which that payment is properly includable in gross income for purposes of this part, Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 35, Sec. 22.   Effective May 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17553.

Section 454(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to matured United States Savings Bonds, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 40.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17555.

In any case where spouses file separate returns, the Franchise Tax Board may distribute, apportion, or allocate gross income between the spouses, if it is determined that such distribution, apportionment, or allocation is necessary in order to reflect the proper income of the spouses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 101.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17556.

Notwithstanding Section 442 of the Internal Revenue Code, the estate may change its annual accounting period one time without the approval of the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1102, Sec. 22.   Effective September 27, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

17559.

(a) Section 451(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule for proceeds from livestock sold on account of drought, is modified by substituting the phrase “drought, flood, or other weather-related conditions, and that those conditions” in lieu of the phrase “drought conditions, and that these drought conditions” contained therein.

(b) This section shall apply to sales and exchanges after December 31, 1996.

(c) This section shall not apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 53.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17560.

(a) The provisions of Sections 811(c)(4), 811(c)(6), and 811(c)(7) of Public Law 99-514, as modified by Section 1008(f) of Public Law 100-647, shall apply.

(b) The provisions of Section 812 of Public Law 99-514, relating to the disallowance of use of installment method for certain obligations as modified by Section 1008(g) of Public Law 100-647, shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987.

(c) The repeal of Section 453C of the Internal Revenue Code by Section 10202(a) of Public Law 100-203, relating to repeal of the proportionate disallowance of the installment method, shall apply to dispositions in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(d) (1) In the case of any installment obligation to which Section 453(l)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code applies, in lieu of the provisions of Section 453(l)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, the tax imposed under Section 17041 or 17048 for any taxable year for which payment is received on that obligation shall be increased by the amount of interest determined in the manner provided under Section 453(l)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) The provisions of Sections 10202 and 10204 of Public Law 100-203 are modified to provide for each of the
 following:

(A) The provisions of Section 10202 shall apply to dispositions in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(B) The provisions of Section 10204 shall apply to costs incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(C) Any adjustments required by Section 481 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be included in gross income as follows:

(i) Fifty percent in the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(ii) Fifty percent in the second taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(e) (1) In the case of any installment obligation to which Section 453A
 of the Internal Revenue Code applies and which is outstanding as of the close of the taxable year, in lieu of the provisions of Section 453A(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, the tax imposed by Section 17041 or 17048 for the taxable year shall be increased by the amount of interest determined in the manner provided under Section 453A(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) The provisions of Section 453A(c)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the maximum rate used in calculating the deferred tax liability, are modified to refer to the maximum rate of tax imposed under Section 17041 in lieu of the maximum rate of tax imposed under Section 1 or 11 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 807, Sec. 8.   Effective September 23, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17560.5.

(a) Section 461(j) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on excess farm losses of certain taxpayers, shall not apply.

(b) (1) Section 11012(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), relating to limitation on excess business losses on noncorporate taxpayers, shall apply except as otherwise provided.

(2) Section 461(l)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation, as amended by Section 11012(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), is modified by substituting “beginning after December 31, 2018” for the phrase “beginning after December
 31, 2017, and before January 1, 2026.”

(3) Section 461(l)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to disallowed loss carryover, as amended by Section 11012(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), is modified by substituting “Any loss which is disallowed under paragraph (1) shall be treated as a carryover excess business loss for the following taxable year.” for “Any loss which is disallowed under paragraph (1) shall be treated as a net operating loss carryover to the following taxable year under section 172.”

(4) Section 461(l)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by Section 11012(a)
 of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), is modified by inserting “(i) the sum of (I) Any prior year carryover excess business losses, plus” below “In general, the term ‘excess business loss’ means the excess (if any) of.”

(5) Section 461(l)(3)(A)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by Section 11012(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), is modified by inserting “(II)” for “(i).”

(6) Section 461(l)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to coordination with section 469, as amended by Section 11012(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017
 (Public Law 115-97), is modified by substituting “Section 17561” for “section 469.”

(c) (1) The amendments to Section 461(l) of the Internal Revenue Code made by Section 2304(a) and (b) of Public Law 116-136, relating to the modification of limitation on losses for taxpayers other than corporations, shall not apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) Section 2304(b)(2)(B) of Public Law 116-136 shall apply.

(d) The amendments to Section 461(l)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code made by Section 9041(a) of Public Law 117-2, relating to the extension of limitation on excess business losses of noncorporate taxpayers, shall not apply.

(e) The amendments
 to Section 461(l)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code made by Section 13903(b)(1) of Public Law 117-169, relating to the extension of limitation on excess business losses of noncorporate taxpayers, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 25.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17561.

(a) Section 469(c)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for taxpayers in real property business, shall not apply.

(b) Section 469(d)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to passive activity credits, is modified to refer to the following credits:

(1) The credit for
 research expenses allowed by Section 17052.12.

(2) The credit for certain wages paid (targeted jobs) allowed by Section 17053.7.

(3) The credit allowed by former Section 17057 (relating to clinical testing expenses).

(4) The credit for low-income housing allowed by Section 17058.

(c) Section 469(g)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to provide that if all gain or loss realized on the disposition of the taxpayer’s entire interest in any passive activity (or former passive activity) is recognized, the excess of—

(1) The sum of—

(A) Any loss from that activity for that taxable year (determined after application of
 Section 469(b) of the Internal Revenue Code), plus

(B) Any loss realized on that disposition, over

(2) Net income or gain for the taxable year from all passive activities (determined without regard to losses described in paragraph (1)),shall be treated as a loss which is not from a passive activity.

(d) (1) For purposes of applying the provisions of Section 469(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) offset for rental real estate activities, the dollar limitation specified in Section 469(i)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to dollar limitation, for the credit allowed under Section 17058, relating to low-income housing, shall not apply.

(2) The amendments made to this subdivision by the act adding this paragraph shall apply to each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020.

(e) Section 502 of the Tax Reform Act of 1986 (P.L. 99-514) shall apply.

(f) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, the provisions of Section 10212 of Public Law 100-203, relating to treatment of publicly traded partnerships under Section 469 of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 159, Sec. 25.   (AB 101)   Effective July 31, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17563.5.

(a) The amendment made by Section 7001(a) of the Internal Revenue Service Restructuring and Reform Act of 1998 (Public Law 105-206) to Section 404(a)(11) of the Internal Revenue Code, regarding determinations relating to deferred compensation, shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002.

(b) In the case of any taxpayer required by enactment of this section to change the method of accounting, for that taxpayer’s first taxable year
 beginning on or after January 1, 2002, each of the following shall apply for purposes of this part, Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001):

(1) The change shall be treated as initiated by the taxpayer.

(2) The change shall be treated as made with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) The net amount of the adjustments required to be taken into account by the taxpayer under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 17551) shall be taken into account ratably over the three-taxable-year period beginning with that taxpayer’s first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 34, Sec. 24.   Effective May 8, 2002.   See identical section added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

17563.5.

(a) The amendment made by Section 7001(a) of the Internal Revenue Service Restructuring and Reform Act of 1998 (Public Law 105-206) to Section 404(a)(11) of the Internal Revenue Code, regarding determinations relating to deferred compensation, shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after
 January 1, 2002.

(b) In the case of any taxpayer required by enactment of this section to change the method of accounting, for that taxpayer’s first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2002, each of the following shall apply for purposes of this part, Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001):

(1) The change shall be treated as initiated by the taxpayer.

(2) The change shall be treated as made with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) The net amount of the adjustments required to be taken into account by the taxpayer under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 17551) shall be taken into account ratably over the three taxable year period beginning with that taxpayer’s first taxable year beginning
 on or after January 1, 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 35, Sec. 24.   Effective May 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17563.51.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, the amendments made by Section 13102(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to Section 447 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to method of accounting for corporations engaged in farming, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, the amendments made by Section 13102(e)(2) of
 the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97), relating to preservation of suspense account rules with respect to any existing suspense accounts, shall apply to any suspense account existing as of the effective date of the act adding this subdivision.

(c) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, the amendments made by Section 13102(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to Section 448 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on use of cash method of accounting, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(d) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, the amendments made by Section 13102(b) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to Section 263A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to capitalization and inclusion in inventory cost of certain expenses, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(e) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, the amendments made by Section 13102(c) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to Section 471 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the general rule for inventories, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(f) (1) Any change in method of accounting made pursuant to this section shall be treated for purposes of applying Section 481 of the Internal Revenue Code, as applicable for California purposes under Section 17551, as initiated by the taxpayer and made with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) Section 13102(e)(1) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) does not apply to subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) and except as provided in subparagraph (B), a taxpayer may elect to apply the provisions of this section to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2019.

(B) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), a taxpayer may elect to apply the provisions of subdivision (b) to suspense accounts established before the effective date of the act adding this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 39, Sec. 14.   (AB 91)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17564.

(a) Long-term contracts shall be accounted for in accordance with the special rules set forth in Section 460 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) (1) The provisions of Section 804(d) of Public Law 99-514, relating to the effective date of modifications in the method of accounting for long-term contracts, shall be applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987.

(2) In the case of a contract entered into after February 28, 1986, during a taxable year beginning before January 1, 1987, an adjustment to income shall be made upon completion of the contract, if necessary, to correct any
 underreporting or overreporting of income, for purposes of this part, resulting from differences between state and federal law for the taxable year in which the contract began.

(c) (1) The amendments to Section 460 of the Internal Revenue Code made by Section 10203 of Public Law 100-203, relating to a reduction in the percentage of items taken into account under the completed contract method, shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(2) In the case of a contract entered into after October 13, 1987, during a taxable year beginning before January 1, 1990, an adjustment to income shall be made upon completion of the contract, if necessary, to correct any underreporting or overreporting of income, for purposes of this part, resulting
 from differences between California and federal law for taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 1990.

(d) (1) The amendments to Section 460 of the Internal Revenue Code made by Section 5041 of Public Law 100-647, relating to a reduction in the percentage of items taken into account under the completed contract method, shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(2) In the case of a contract entered into after June 20, 1988, during a taxable year beginning before January 1, 1990, an adjustment to income shall be made upon completion of the contract, if necessary, to correct any underreporting or overreporting of income, for purposes of this part, resulting from differences between California and federal law for taxable years beginning
 prior to January 1, 1990.

(e) (1) The amendments to Section 460 of the Internal Revenue Code made by Section 7621 of Public Law 101-239, relating to the repeal of the completed contract method of accounting for long-term contracts, shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(2) In the case of a contract entered into after July 10, 1989, during a taxable year beginning before January 1, 1990, an adjustment to income shall be made upon completion of the contract, if necessary, to correct any underreporting or overreporting of income, for purposes of this part, resulting from differences between California and federal law for taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 1990.

(f) For purposes of applying paragraphs (2) to (6), inclusive, of Section 460(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the look-back method, any adjustment to income computed under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), (c), (d), or (e) shall be deemed to have been reported in the taxable year from which the adjustment arose, rather than the taxable year in which the contract was
 completed.

(g) (1) For contracts entered into on or after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision, the amendments made by Section 13102(d) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 460 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for long-term contracts, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) For contracts entered into on or after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision, the amendments made by Section 13102(e)(3) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), relating to exemption from percentage completion for long-term contracts, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(3) (A) Any
 change in method of accounting made pursuant to this section shall be treated for purposes of applying Section 481 of the Internal Revenue Code, as applicable for California purposes under Section 17551, as initiated by the taxpayer and made with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) Section 13102(e)(1) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) does not apply to this subdivision.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B), a taxpayer may elect to apply the provisions of this subdivision, where otherwise allowed, to contracts entered into on or after January 1, 2018, in taxable years ending after January 1, 2018.

(h) The amendments to Section 460(c)(6)(B)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code made by Section
 143(a)(2) and Section 143(b)(6)(I) of Public Law 114-113, relating to the special rule for federal long-term contracts, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 55.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17565.

(a) The taxable year of a taxpayer may not be different than the taxable year used for purposes of the Internal Revenue Code, unless initiated or approved by the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) For purposes of this section, whenever a taxpayer is required to make a federal return for a period of less than 12 months, that period shall be deemed to be a taxable year, and Section 17552 shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1352, Sec. 53.5.   Effective October 2, 1989.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1989, by Sec. 172 of Ch. 1352.)
-------------------------------------------

17567.

The amendments to Section 453B(e) of the Internal Revenue Code as enacted by Section 13512(b)(1) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), relating to the repeal of the small life insurance company deduction, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 56.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17570.

(a) Section 13233(c)(2)(C) of the Revenue Reconciliation Act of 1993 (Public Law 103-66), relating to the effective date for changes in the mark to market accounting method for securities dealers, is modified to provide that the amount taken into account under Section 481 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall be taken into account ratably over the five-taxable-year period beginning with the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1997.

(b) In the case of any
 taxpayer required by the enactment of the act adding this subdivision, which act incorporated by reference the amendments made by Section 7003 of the Internal Revenue Service Restructuring and Reform Act of 1998 (Public Law 105-206) to Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002, to change its method of accounting on its first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2002, then each of the following shall apply for purposes of this part, Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001):

(1) The change shall be treated as initiated by the taxpayer.

(2) The change shall be treated as made with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) The taxpayer shall not be required to make a change in the method of accounting until
 the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2002.

(4) The net amount of the adjustments required to be taken into account by the taxpayer under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 17551) shall be taken into account ratably over the three taxable year period beginning with that taxpayer’s first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2002.

(c) (1) If a taxpayer has, at any time, made an election for federal purposes under Section 475(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election of mark to market for dealers in commodities, to have Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code apply, Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply to that dealer in commodities for state purposes, a separate election for state purposes shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5, and the federal election shall be
 binding for purposes of this part.

(2) If a taxpayer fails to make, or has not previously made, an election for federal purposes under Section 475(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election of mark to market for dealers in commodities, to have Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code apply, an election under Section 475(e) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be allowed for state purposes, Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply to that dealer in commodities for state purposes, and a separate election for state purposes shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5.

(d) (1) If a taxpayer has, at any time, made an election for federal purposes under Section 475(f)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election of mark to market for traders in securities, to have Section 475 of the Internal
 Revenue Code apply to a trade or business, Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply to that trader in securities for state purposes with respect to that trade or business, a separate election for state purposes with respect to that trade or business shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5, and the federal election shall be binding for purposes of this part.

(2) If a taxpayer fails to make, or has not previously made, an election for federal purposes under Section 475(f)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election of mark to market for traders in securities, to have Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code apply to a trade or business, an election under Section 475(f)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be allowed for state purposes with respect to that trade or business, Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply to that trader in securities for state purposes with
 respect to that trade or business, and a separate election for state purposes shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5.

(e) (1) If a taxpayer has, at any time, made an election for federal purposes under Section 475(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election of mark to market for traders in commodities, to have Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code apply to a trade or business, Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply to that trader in commodities for state purposes with respect to that trade or business, a separate election for state purposes with respect to that trade or business shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5, and the federal election with respect to that trade or business shall be binding for purposes of this part.

(2) If a taxpayer fails to
 make, or has not previously made, an election for federal purposes under Section 475(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election of mark to market for traders in commodities, to have Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code apply to a trade or business, an election under Section 475(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be allowed for state purposes with respect to that trade or business, Section 475 of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply to that trader in commodities for state purposes with respect to that trade or business, and a separate election for state purposes with respect to that trade or business shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5.

(f) (1) An election under Section 475(e) or (f) of the Internal Revenue Code made for federal purposes with respect to a taxable year beginning before January 1, 1998, shall be treated as having been made for state
 purposes with respect to the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1998.

(2) Section 1001(d)(4)(B) of the Taxpayer Relief Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-34), relating to the effective date for election of mark to market by securities traders and traders and dealers in commodities, is modified to provide that the requirement for timely identification shall be treated as timely made for state purposes if that identification is treated as timely made for federal purposes, and the amount taken into account under Section 481 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall be taken into account ratably over the four-taxable-year period beginning with the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 35, Sec. 25.   Effective May 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Exempt Trusts and Common Trust Funds [17631. - 17677.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Rule [17631. - 17640.]

17631.

An organization described in Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be exempt from taxation under this part unless such exemption is denied under Sections 17635 to 17639, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 39.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

17632.

An organization exempt from taxation under Section 17631 shall be subject to tax to the extent provided in Article 2 (commencing at Section 17651) of this chapter (relating to tax on unrelated income), but, notwithstanding Article 2, shall be considered an organization exempt from income taxes for the purpose of any law which refers to organizations exempt from income taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 847.)
-------------------------------------------

17635.

(a) An organization described in Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code which is subject to the provisions of this section shall not be exempt from taxation under Section 17631 if it has engaged in a prohibited transaction after December 31, 1960.

(b) An organization described in Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be denied exemption from taxation under Section 17631 by reason of subdivision (a) only for taxable years after the taxable year during which it is notified by the Franchise Tax Board that it has engaged in a prohibited transaction,
 unless the organization entered into the prohibited transaction with the purpose of diverting corpus or income of the organization from its exempt purposes, and the transaction involved a substantial part of the corpus or income of the organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 131.)
-------------------------------------------

17636.

Sections 17635 to 17639, inclusive, apply to any organization described in Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 41.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

17637.

For purposes of Sections 17635 to 17639, inclusive, the term “prohibited transaction” means any transaction in which an organization subject to the provisions of Sections 17635 to 17639, inclusive—(a) Lends any part of its income or corpus, without the receipt of adequate security and a reasonable rate of interest, to;(b) Pays any compensation, in excess of a reasonable allowance for salaries or other compensation for personal services actually rendered, to;(c) Makes any part of its services available on a preferential basis to;(d) Makes any substantial purchase of securities or any other property, for more than adequate consideration in money or money’s worth, from;(e) Sells any substantial part of its securities or other property, for less than an adequate consideration in money or money’s worth to; or(f) Engages in any other transaction which results in a substantial diversion of its income or corpus to;the creator of such organization (if a trust); a person who has made a substantial contribution to such organization; a member of the family (as defined in Section 267(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code) of an individual who is the creator of such trust or who has made a substantial contribution to such organization; or a corporation controlled by such creator or person through the ownership, directly or indirectly, of 50 percent or more of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock entitled to vote or 50 percent or more of the total value of shares of all classes of stock of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 42.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

17638.

Any organization described in Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code or a trust which is denied exemption under Section 17631 by reason of Section 17635, with respect to any taxable year following the taxable year in which notice of denial of exemption was received, may, under regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, file claim for exemption, and if the Franchise Tax Board, pursuant to such regulations, is satisfied that such organization will not knowingly again engage in a prohibited transaction, such organization shall be exempt with respect to taxable years after the year in which such claim is
 filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 43.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

17639.

For purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 17637, a bond, debenture, note, or certificate or other evidence of indebtedness (hereinafter in this section referred to as “obligation”) acquired by a trust described in Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be treated as a loan made without the receipt of adequate security if—

(a) The obligation is acquired—

(1) On the market, either (i) at the price of the obligation
 prevailing on a national securities exchange which is registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission, or (ii) if the obligation is not traded on such a national securities exchange, at a price not less favorable to the trust than the offering price for the obligation as established by current bid and asked prices quoted by persons independent of the issuer;

(2) From an underwriter, at a price (i) not in excess of the public offering price for the obligation as set forth in a prospectus or offering circular filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, and (ii) at which a substantial portion of the same issue is acquired by persons independent of the issuer; or

(3) Directly from the issuer, at a price not less favorable to the trust than the price paid currently for a substantial portion of the same issue by persons independent of the issuer;

(b) Immediately following acquisition of the obligation—

(1) Not more than 25 percent of the aggregate amount of obligations issued in the issue and outstanding at the time of acquisition is held by the trust, and

(2) At least 50 percent of the aggregate amount referred to in paragraph (1) is held by persons independent of the issuer; and

(c) Immediately following acquisition of the obligation, not more than 25 percent of the assets of the trust is invested in obligations of persons described in Section 17637.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 42.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17640.

Subdivision (a) of Section 17637 shall not apply to a loan made by a trust described in Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code to the employer (or to a renewal of such a loan or, if the loan is repayable upon demand, to a continuation of such a loan) if the loan bears a reasonable rate of interest, and if (in the case of a making or renewal)—

(a) The employer is prohibited (at the time of the making or renewal) by
 any law of the United States or regulation thereunder from directly or indirectly pledging, as security for such a loan, a particular class or classes of his assets the value of which (at that time) represents more than one-half of the value of all his or her assets;

(b) The making or renewal, as the case may be, is approved in writing as an investment that is consistent with the exempt purposes of the trust by a trustee who is independent of the employer, and no other similar trustee had previously refused to give that written approval; and

(c) Immediately following the making or renewal, as the case may be, the aggregate amount loaned by the trust to the employer, without the receipt of adequate security, does not exceed 25 percent of the value of all the assets of the trust.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (b),
 the term “trustee” means, with respect to any trust for which there is more than one trustee who is independent of the employer, a majority of those independent trustees. For purposes of subdivision (c), the determination as to whether any amount loaned by the trust to the employer is loaned without the receipt of adequate security shall be made without regard to Section 17639.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 43.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Taxation of Business Income of Certain Exempt Organizations [17651. - 17651.]

17651.

(a) There is hereby imposed for each taxable year on the unrelated business taxable income (as defined in Section 23732) of every trust a tax computed as provided in subdivision (e) of Section 17041. In making that computation for purposes of this section, the term “taxable income” as used in subdivisions (a) and (e) of Section 17041 shall be read as “unrelated business taxable income” as defined in Section 23732.

(b) The tax imposed by subdivision (a) shall apply in the
 case of any trust which is exempt, except as provided in this article, from taxation under this part by reason of Section 17631 and which, if it were not for such exemption, would be subject to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 17731) relating to estates, trusts, beneficiaries, and decedents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 44.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------


